sk-SK: Typ komponentu mierky oleja: Kompletná zostava mierky; Iba čepeľ/tyčka mierky; Vodiaca trubica alebo lievik mierky; Iba rukoväť mierky; Upevňovacia konzola alebo prvok mierky; O-krúžok alebo tesnenie trubice mierky; Súprava trubice a mierky; Iba trubica mierky; Iné
th: ส่วนประกอบก้านวัดระดับน้ำมันเครื่อง: ชุดก้านวัดน้ำมันเครื่องแบบสมบูรณ์; ก้านวัด/แกนวัดเท่านั้น; ไกด์นำก้านวัดหรือกรวย; ด้ามจับก้านวัดเท่านั้น; ขายึดก้านวัดหรือตัวล็อก; โอริงหรือซีลท่อก้านวัด; ชุดท่อก้านวัดและแกนวัด; ท่อก้านวัดเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
da: Komponenttype for oliepind: Komplet oliepindssamling; Kun oliepindsklinge/-stang; Oliepindsstyr eller tragt; Kun oliepindshåndtag; Oliepindsbeslag eller fiksering; O-ring eller tætning til oliepindsrør; Sæt med oliepindsrør og -stang; Kun oliepindsrør; Andet
lt-LT: Alyvos matuoklio komponento tipas: Visas matuoklio blokas; Tik matuoklio geležtė / strypas; Matuoklio kreiptuvas arba piltuvas; Tik matuoklio rankenėlė; Matuoklio laikantysis laikiklis arba tvirtinimo detalė; Matuoklio vamzdelio sandarinimo žiedas arba tarpiklis; Matuoklio vamzdelio ir strypo rinkinys; Tik matuoklio vamzdelis; Kita
zh-CN: 机油尺组件类型: 机油尺总成; 仅机油尺条/杆; 机油尺导管或漏斗; 仅机油尺手柄; 机油尺固定支架或紧固件; 机油尺套管 O 形环或密封件; 机油尺套管和标尺套件; 仅机油尺套管; 其他
nl: Oliepeilstok componenttype: Complete peilstokset; Alleen peilstok/staaf; Peilstokgeleider of -trechter; Alleen peilstokhandvat; Bevestigingsbeugel of sluiting peilstok; O-ring of afdichting peilstokbuis; Peilstokbuis en -stokset; Alleen peilstokbuis; Overig
fr: Type de composant de jauge d’huile: Ensemble jauge complet; Tige de jauge uniquement; Guide ou entonnoir de jauge; Poignée de jauge uniquement; Support de retenue ou fixation de jauge; Joint torique ou joint de tube de jauge; Kit de tube et jauge; Tube de jauge uniquement; Autre
tr: Yağ seviye çubuğu bileşen tipi: Komple yağ çubuğu tertibatı; Sadece seviye çubuğu; Yağ çubuğu kılavuzu veya hunisi; Sadece yağ çubuğu sapı; Yağ çubuğu sabitleme braketi veya bağlantı elemanı; Yağ çubuğu borusu O-ring'i veya contası; Yağ çubuğu borusu ve çubuk kiti; Sadece yağ çubuğu borusu; Diğer
pt-PT: tipo de componente da vareta de medição de óleo: Conjunto completo da vareta; Apenas haste/lâmina da vareta; Guia ou funil da vareta; Apenas pega da vareta; Fecho ou suporte de fixação da vareta; O-ring ou vedante do tubo da vareta; Kit de vareta e tubo; Apenas tubo da vareta; Outro
es: Tipo de componente de la varilla medidora de aceite: Ensamblaje completo de varilla medidora; Solo hoja/varilla medidora; Guía o embudo de varilla medidora; Solo mango de varilla medidora; Soporte o sujetador de varilla medidora; Junta tórica o sello de tubo de varilla medidora; Kit de tubo y varilla medidora; Solo tubo de varilla medidora; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul componentei jojei de ulei: Ansamblu complet jojă de ulei; Doar tija jojei; Ghidaj sau pâlnie jojă; Doar mânerul jojei; Suport sau element de fixare pentru jojă; Garnitură inelară sau sigiliu pentru tubul jojei; Kit jojă și tub pentru jojă; Doar tubul jojei; Altele
sv: Typ av oljestickekomponent: Komplett oljesticka; Endast sticka; Styrrör eller tratt för oljesticka; Endast handtag för oljesticka; Fäste eller skruv för oljesticka; O-ring eller tätning för oljestickerör; Sats med rör och oljesticka; Endast oljestickerör; Övrigt
hu: Olajszintmérő pálca alkatrésztípusa: Teljes nívópálca-szerelvény; Csak nívópálca rúd / lemez; Nívópálca vezető vagy tölcsér; Csak nívópálca fogantyú; Nívópálca-tartó konzol vagy rögzítő; Nívópálcacső O-gyűrű vagy tömítés; Nívópálcacső és pálca készlet; Csak nívópálcacső; Egyéb
cs: Typ součásti měrky oleje: Kompletní měrka; Pouze tyč/čepel měrky; Vodicí trubička / trychtýř; Pouze rukojeť měrky; Držák nebo upevnění měrky; O-kroužek nebo těsnění vodicí trubičky; Sada vodicí trubičky a měrky; Pouze vodicí trubička; Ostatní
it: Tipo di componente dell'astina dell'olio: Gruppo asta di livello completo; Solo lama/asta di livello; Guida o imbuto dell'asta di livello; Solo impugnatura dell'asta di livello; Staffa di fissaggio o elemento di fissaggio dell'asta di livello; O-ring o guarnizione del tubo dell'asta di livello; Kit tubo e asta di livello; Solo tubo dell'asta di livello; Altro
ja: オイルレベルゲージコンポーネントタイプ: ディップスティックアセンブリ一式; ディップスティックブレード/ロッドのみ; ディップスティックガイドまたはファンネル; ディップスティックハンドルのみ; ディップスティック固定ブラケットまたはファスナー; ディップスティックチューブOリングまたはシール; ディップスティックチューブおよびスティックキット; ディップスティックチューブのみ; その他
ru: Тип компонента масляного щупа: Щуп в сборе; Только стержень щупа; Направляющая или воронка щупа; Только ручка щупа; Кронштейн или крепеж щупа; Уплотнительное кольцо или прокладка трубки щупа; Трубка и щуп в комплекте; Только трубка щупа; Другое
de: Typ der Ölmessstab-Komponente: Kompletter Ölmessstab; Nur Messstab/Klinge; Führungsrohr oder Trichter für Ölmessstab; Nur Messstabgriff; Halterung oder Befestigung für Ölmessstab; O-Ring oder Dichtung für Ölmessstabrohr; Ölmessstab- und Rohr-Set; Nur Ölmessstabrohr; Andere
pt-BR: Vareta de óleo componente tipo: Conjunto completo da vareta medidora; Apenas haste/lâmina da vareta; Guia ou funil da vareta; Apenas alça da vareta; Suporte ou fixador de retenção da vareta; Anel de vedação ou retentor do tubo da vareta; Kit de vareta e tubo; Apenas tubo da vareta; Outro
fi: Öljynmittatikun osan tyyppi: Täydellinen mittatikkukokoonpano; Vain mittatikun terä/varsi; Mittatikun ohjuri tai suppilo; Vain mittatikun kahva; Mittatikun kiinnityskorvake tai kiinnitin; Mittatikun putken O-rengas tai tiiviste; Mittatikun putki ja tikku -sarja; Vain mittatikun putki; Muu
zh-TW: 機油尺組件類型: 完整量尺總成; 僅量尺片/桿; 量尺導管或漏斗; 僅量尺把手; 量尺固定支架或緊固件; 量尺管 O 型環或密封件; 量尺管與量尺套件; 僅量尺管; 其他
pl: Typ komponentu bagnetu oleju: Kompletny zestaw bagnetu; Tylko pręt/ostrze bagnetu; Prowadnica lub lejek bagnetu; Tylko uchwyt bagnetu; Wspornik lub element mocujący bagnet; O-ring lub uszczelka rurki bagnetu; Zestaw rurki i bagnetu; Tylko rurka bagnetu; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta komponente mjerne šipke za ulje: Potpuni sklop mjerne šipke; Samo list / šipka mjerne šipke; Vodilica ili lijevak mjerne šipke; Samo ručka mjerne šipke; Nosač ili zatvarač mjerne šipke; O-prsten ili brtva cijevi mjerne šipke; Komplet cijevi i mjerne šipke; Samo cijev mjerne šipke; Ostalo
vi: loại linh kiện que thăm dầu: Cụm que thăm dầu hoàn chỉnh; Chỉ que/thanh thăm dầu; Ống dẫn hoặc phễu que thăm dầu; Chỉ tay cầm que thăm dầu; Giá đỡ hoặc móc cài que thăm dầu; Gioăng chữ O hoặc phớt ống thăm dầu; Bộ ống và que thăm dầu; Chỉ ống thăm dầu; Khác
nb: Komponenttype for peilepinne: Komplett peilepinneenhet; Kun peilepinne/stang; Peilepinne-føring eller -trakt; Kun peilepinnehåndtak; Festebrakett eller skrue for peilepinne; O-ring eller tetning for peilepinnerør; Sett med peilepinne og rør; Kun peilepinnerør; Annet
ko: 오일 딥스틱 구성품 유형: 딥스틱 어셈블리 전체; 딥스틱 블레이드/로드만; 딥스틱 가이드 또는 퍼널; 딥스틱 핸들만; 딥스틱 고정 브래킷 또는 패스너; 딥스틱 튜브 O링 또는 씰; 딥스틱 튜브 및 스틱 키트; 딥스틱 튜브만; 기타
bg-BG: Тип компонент на маслоизмервателната пръчка: Цялостен механизъм на щеката за масло; Само острие/пръчка на щеката; Водач или фуния за щеката; Само дръжка на щеката; Задържаща скоба или крепежен елемент на щеката; О-пръстен или уплътнение за тръбата на щеката; Комплект тръба и щека; Само тръба за щеката; Друго
en: Oil dipstick component type: Complete dipstick assembly; Dipstick blade/rod only; Dipstick guide or funnel; Dipstick handle only; Dipstick retaining bracket or fastener; Dipstick tube O-ring or seal; Dipstick tube and stick kit; Dipstick tube only; Other
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος δείκτη στάθμης λαδιού: Πλήρες συγκρότημα δείκτη στάθμης λαδιού; Μόνο λάμα/ράβδος δείκτη; Οδηγός ή χωνί δείκτη; Μόνο λαβή δείκτη; Βάση στήριξης ή σφιγκτήρας δείκτη; O-ring ή στεγανοποιητικό σωλήνα δείκτη; Κιτ σωλήνα και δείκτη; Μόνο σωλήνας δείκτη; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta komponente merilne palice za olje: Kompletni sklop merilne palice; Samo list/palica merilne palice; Vodilo ali lijak za merilno palico; Samo ročaj merilne palice; Nosilec ali pritrdilni element za merilno palico; O-obroč ali tesnilo cevi za merilno palico; Komplet cevi in merilne palice; Samo cev za merilno palico; Drugo